Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3009.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin CITY OF BROOKLYN PARK; TIF AUTHORITY; BROOKLYN BOULEVARD/WEST BROADWAY AREA.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment of districts. new text end new text begin Under the special rules established in subdivision 2, the economic development authority of the city of Brooklyn Park or the city of Brooklyn Park may establish one or more redevelopment tax increment financing districts located wholly within the area of the city of Brooklyn Park. The districts may be composed of the following parcels identified by their current parcel identification numbers together with adjacent and internal roads and rights-of-way: new text end new text begin 2011921430092 new text end new text begin 2011921430099 new text end new text begin 2011921440089 new text end new text begin 2011921430101 new text end new text begin 2011921440088 new text end new text begin 2911921120001 new text end new text begin 2911921120004 new text end new text begin 2911921120032 new text end new text begin 2911921110004 new text end new text begin 2911921120005 new text end new text begin 2011921430093 new text end new text begin 2011921430100 new text end new text begin 2011921430102 new text end new text begin 2011921430103 new text end new text begin 2911921110118 new text end new text begin 2911921120006 new text end new text begin 2911921120043 new text end new text begin 2011921340022 new text end new text begin 2011921340027 new text end new text begin 2011921340036 new text end new text begin 2011921340038 new text end new text begin 2011921340042 new text end new text begin 2011921340047 new text end new text begin 2011921340048 new text end new text begin 2011921340070 new text end new text begin 2011921340071 new text end new text begin 2011921340026 new text end new text begin 2011921340037 new text end new text begin 2011921340046 new text end new text begin 2011921340050 new text end new text begin 2011921340069 new text end new text begin 2011921340075 new text end new text begin 2011921340079 new text end new text begin 2011921340080 new text end new text begin 2011921330004 new text end new text begin 2011921330005 new text end new text begin 2011921330006 new text end new text begin 2011921330012 new text end new text begin 2011921340024 new text end new text begin 2011921340025 new text end new text begin 2011921340029 new text end new text begin 2011921340044 new text end new text begin 2011921340066 new text end new text begin 2011921340068 new text end new text begin 2011921340073 new text end new text begin 2011921340076 new text end new text begin 2011921340078 new text end new text begin 2911921210023 new text end new text begin 2911921210030 new text end new text begin 2911921210040 new text end new text begin 2911921210042 new text end new text begin 2911921210051 new text end new text begin 2911921210052 new text end new text begin 2911921210054 new text end new text begin 2911921210056 new text end new text begin 2911921210057 new text end new text begin 2911921210063 new text end new text begin 2911921210074 new text end new text begin 2911921210077 new text end new text begin 2911921210078 new text end new text begin 2911921210079 new text end new text begin 2911921210090 new text end new text begin 2911921220010 new text end new text begin 2911921220012 new text end new text begin 2911921220021 new text end new text begin 2911921220023 new text end new text begin 2911921220025 new text end new text begin 2911921240102 new text end new text begin 2911921240117 new text end new text begin 2911921240132 new text end new text begin 2911921210021 new text end new text begin 2911921210024 new text end new text begin 2911921210025 new text end new text begin 2911921210026 new text end new text begin 2911921210027 new text end new text begin 2911921210028 new text end new text begin 2911921210029 new text end new text begin 2911921210034 new text end new text begin 2911921210035 new text end new text begin 2911921210037 new text end new text begin 2911921210038 new text end new text begin 2911921210039 new text end new text begin 2911921210053 new text end new text begin 2911921210061 new text end new text begin 2911921210062 new text end new text begin 2911921210066 new text end new text begin 2911921210070 new text end new text begin 2911921210073 new text end new text begin 2911921210081 new text end new text begin 2911921210082 new text end new text begin 2911921210086 new text end new text begin 2911921210094 new text end new text begin 2911921210105 new text end new text begin 2911921210106 new text end new text begin 2911921220011 new text end new text begin 2911921220020 new text end new text begin 2911921220022 new text end new text begin 2911921220028 new text end new text begin 2911921240101 new text end new text begin 2911921240104 new text end new text begin 2911921240105 new text end new text begin 2911921240106 new text end new text begin 2911921240109 new text end new text begin 2911921240134 new text end new text begin 2911921210007 new text end new text begin 2911921210050 new text end new text begin 2911921210055 new text end new text begin 2911921210058 new text end new text begin 2911921210059 new text end new text begin 2911921210071 new text end new text begin 2911921210083 new text end new text begin 2911921210104 new text end new text begin 2911921240095 new text end new text begin 2911921240099 new text end new text begin 2911921240118 new text end new text begin 2011921320010 new text end new text begin 2011921330003 new text end new text begin 2011921330007 new text end new text begin 2011921340023 new text end new text begin 2011921340028 new text end new text begin 2011921340034 new text end new text begin 2011921340035 new text end new text begin 2011921340039 new text end new text begin 2011921340040 new text end new text begin 2011921340043 new text end new text begin 2011921340045 new text end new text begin 2011921340049 new text end new text begin 2011921340077 new text end new text begin 2911921210022 new text end new text begin 2911921210031 new text end new text begin 2911921210032 new text end new text begin 2911921210033 new text end new text begin 2911921210036 new text end new text begin 2911921210041 new text end new text begin 2911921210060 new text end new text begin 2911921210064 new text end new text begin 2911921210065 new text end new text begin 2911921210067 new text end new text begin 2911921210068 new text end new text begin 2911921210069 new text end new text begin 2911921210080 new text end new text begin 2911921210084 new text end new text begin 2911921210085 new text end new text begin 2911921210087 new text end new text begin 2911921210088 new text end new text begin 2911921210089 new text end new text begin 2911921210091 new text end new text begin 2911921210092 new text end new text begin 2911921210093 new text end new text begin 2911921210096 new text end new text begin 2911921210103 new text end new text begin 2911921210111 new text end new text begin 2911921220024 new text end new text begin 2911921220026 new text end new text begin 2911921220029 new text end new text begin 2911921240100 new text end new text begin 2911921240103 new text end new text begin 2911921240107 new text end new text begin 2911921240133 new text end new text begin 2911921240135 new text end new text begin 3011921110009 new text end new text begin 3011921110007 new text end new text begin and the following roadways within the city of Brooklyn Park: Brooklyn Boulevard (from and including the intersection at Highway 169 to and including the intersection at Kentucky Avenue North) and West Broadway Avenue (from and including the intersection at 75th Avenue and to and including the intersection at 78th Avenue). new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special rules. new text end new text begin If the city or the authority establishes a tax increment financing district under subdivision 1, the following special rules apply: new text end new text begin (1) the districts are deemed to meet all the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.174, subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (2) expenditures incurred in connection with the development of the property described in subdivision 1 are deemed to meet the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4j; new text end new text begin (3) in addition to any expenditure authorized to be financed with increment under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4, increments from such districts may be spent within the areas described in subdivision 1 on any of the following expenditures: new text end new text begin (i) acquiring and improving public streets and public spaces, including sidewalks, trails, lighting, pedestrian and bike features, plantings, stormwater management, public and private utility burial, public plazas, and public art; and new text end new text begin (ii) commercial and residential building rehabilitation or facade improvements; and new text end new text begin (4) the requirements, limitations, or restrictions in the following statutes do not apply: Minnesota Statutes, sections 469.174, subdivision 25, clause (2); 469.176, subdivisions 4l and 5; and 469.1763, subdivisions 2, 3, and 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Brooklyn Park and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin CITY OF BROOKLYN PARK; TIF AUTHORITY; 610/ZANE AREA.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment of districts. new text end new text begin Under the special rules established in subdivision 2, the economic development authority of the city of Brooklyn Park or the city of Brooklyn Park may establish one or more redevelopment districts located wholly within the area of the city of Brooklyn Park. The districts may be composed of the following parcels identified by their current parcel identification numbers together with adjacent and internal roads and rights-of-way: new text end new text begin 0811921410009 new text end new text begin 0811921440008 new text end new text begin 0911921210097 new text end new text begin 0911921210099 new text end new text begin 0911921220014 new text end new text begin 0911921220015 new text end new text begin 0911921220068 new text end new text begin 0911921230005 new text end new text begin 0911921320016 new text end new text begin 0911921320021 new text end new text begin 0911921320024 new text end new text begin 0911921330006 new text end new text begin 0911921340015 new text end new text begin 0911921340016 new text end new text begin 0911921430009 new text end new text begin 0911921430010 new text end new text begin 0911921430011 new text end new text begin 0911921430012 new text end new text begin 0911921430016 new text end new text begin 0911921430023 new text end new text begin 0911921430027 new text end new text begin 0911921430043 new text end new text begin 0911921430047 new text end new text begin 0911921430050 new text end new text begin 0911921430051 new text end new text begin 0911921430052 new text end new text begin 0911921430056 new text end new text begin 0911921430066 new text end new text begin 0911921430070 new text end new text begin 0911921430074 new text end new text begin 0911921430075 new text end new text begin 0911921430079 new text end new text begin 0911921430084 new text end new text begin 0911921430085 new text end new text begin 0911921430089 new text end new text begin 0911921430091 new text end new text begin 0911921430092 new text end new text begin 0911921430096 new text end new text begin 0911921430101 new text end new text begin 0911921430106 new text end new text begin 0911921430109 new text end new text begin 0911921430111 new text end new text begin 0911921430116 new text end new text begin 0911921430119 new text end new text begin 0911921120005 new text end new text begin 0911921210007 new text end new text begin 0911921230008 new text end new text begin 0911921230049 new text end new text begin 0911921240006 new text end new text begin 0911921240009 new text end new text begin 0911921320018 new text end new text begin 0911921330009 new text end new text begin 0911921430006 new text end new text begin 0911921430014 new text end new text begin 0911921430015 new text end new text begin 0911921430019 new text end new text begin 0911921430020 new text end new text begin 0911921430028 new text end new text begin 0911921430030 new text end new text begin 0911921430033 new text end new text begin 0911921430037 new text end new text begin 0911921430038 new text end new text begin 0911921430040 new text end new text begin 0911921430048 new text end new text begin 0911921430054 new text end new text begin 0911921430055 new text end new text begin 0911921430059 new text end new text begin 0911921430069 new text end new text begin 0911921430071 new text end new text begin 0911921430072 new text end new text begin 0911921430076 new text end new text begin 0911921430080 new text end new text begin 0911921430081 new text end new text begin 0911921430082 new text end new text begin 0911921430083 new text end new text begin 0911921430086 new text end new text begin 0911921430087 new text end new text begin 0911921430088 new text end new text begin 0911921430094 new text end new text begin 0911921430095 new text end new text begin 0911921430099 new text end new text begin 0911921430104 new text end new text begin 0911921430114 new text end new text begin 0911921210006 new text end new text begin 0911921210096 new text end new text begin 0911921210100 new text end new text begin 0911921210101 new text end new text begin 0911921220008 new text end new text begin 0911921220017 new text end new text begin 0911921230014 new text end new text begin 0911921230015 new text end new text begin 0911921240004 new text end new text begin 0911921240007 new text end new text begin 0911921310010 new text end new text begin 0911921310011 new text end new text begin 0911921310012 new text end new text begin 0911921330010 new text end new text begin 0911921330012 new text end new text begin 0911921340009 new text end new text begin 0911921430013 new text end new text begin 0911921430017 new text end new text begin 0911921430021 new text end new text begin 0911921430022 new text end new text begin 0911921430026 new text end new text begin 0911921430031 new text end new text begin 0911921430032 new text end new text begin 0911921430036 new text end new text begin 0911921430041 new text end new text begin 0911921430042 new text end new text begin 0911921430046 new text end new text begin 0911921430053 new text end new text begin 0911921430057 new text end new text begin 0911921430064 new text end new text begin 0911921430065 new text end new text begin 0911921430073 new text end new text begin 0911921430077 new text end new text begin 0911921430078 new text end new text begin 0911921430100 new text end new text begin 0911921430105 new text end new text begin 0911921430107 new text end new text begin 0911921430108 new text end new text begin 0911921430110 new text end new text begin 0911921430115 new text end new text begin 0911921430117 new text end new text begin 0911921430118 new text end new text begin 0811921140050 new text end new text begin 0811921140051 new text end new text begin 0911921210005 new text end new text begin 0911921210095 new text end new text begin 0911921220070 new text end new text begin 0911921220071 new text end new text begin 0911921230009 new text end new text begin 0911921230010 new text end new text begin 0911921230011 new text end new text begin 0911921230012 new text end new text begin 0911921230013 new text end new text begin 0911921240005 new text end new text begin 0911921240008 new text end new text begin 0911921310007 new text end new text begin 0911921310009 new text end new text begin 0911921320023 new text end new text begin 0911921330008 new text end new text begin 0911921330011 new text end new text begin 0911921340008 new text end new text begin 0911921340014 new text end new text begin 0911921340017 new text end new text begin 0911921430018 new text end new text begin 0911921430024 new text end new text begin 0911921430025 new text end new text begin 0911921430029 new text end new text begin 0911921430034 new text end new text begin 0911921430035 new text end new text begin 0911921430039 new text end new text begin 0911921430044 new text end new text begin 0911921430045 new text end new text begin 0911921430049 new text end new text begin 0911921430058 new text end new text begin 0911921430060 new text end new text begin 0911921430061 new text end new text begin 0911921430062 new text end new text begin 0911921430063 new text end new text begin 0911921430067 new text end new text begin 0911921430068 new text end new text begin 0911921430090 new text end new text begin 0911921430093 new text end new text begin 0911921430097 new text end new text begin 0911921430098 new text end new text begin 0911921430102 new text end new text begin 0911921430103 new text end new text begin 0911921430112 new text end new text begin 0911921430113 new text end new text begin 0911921430120 new text end new text begin 1011921330022 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special rules. new text end new text begin If the city or the authority establishes a tax increment financing district under subdivision 1, the following special rules apply: new text end new text begin (1) the districts are deemed to meet all the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.174, subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (2) expenditures incurred in connection with the development of the property described in subdivision 1 are deemed to meet the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4j; new text end new text begin (3) in addition to any expenditure authorized to be financed with increment under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4, increments from such districts may be spent within the areas described in subdivision 1 on any of the following expenditures: new text end new text begin (i) building or property improvements that enhance environmental sustainability; new text end new text begin (ii) commercial and residential building rehabilitation or facade improvements; or new text end new text begin (iii) increased costs of building materials resulting from higher-quality building materials approved by the city or the authority; and new text end new text begin (4) the requirements, limitations, or restrictions in the following statutes do not apply: Minnesota Statutes, sections 469.174, subdivision 25, clause (2); 469.176, subdivisions 4l and 5; and 469.1763, subdivisions 2, 3, and 4. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Brooklyn Park and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 3. new text begin CITY OF BROOKLYN PARK; TIF AUTHORITY; BIOTECH AREA.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment of districts. new text end new text begin Under the special rules established in subdivision 2, the economic development authority of the city of Brooklyn Park or the city of Brooklyn Park may establish one or more redevelopment districts located wholly within the area of the city of Brooklyn Park. The districts may be composed of the following parcels identified by their current parcel identification numbers together with adjacent and internal roads and rights-of-way: new text end new text begin 0711921110003 new text end new text begin 0711921120006 new text end new text begin 0711921110007 new text end new text begin 0711921140001 new text end new text begin 0711921140002 new text end new text begin 0711921140007 new text end new text begin 0711921240002 new text end new text begin 0711921240004 new text end new text begin 0711921110004 new text end new text begin 0711921110006 new text end new text begin 0711921110008 new text end new text begin 0711921120005 new text end new text begin 0711921130005 new text end new text begin 0711921140005 new text end new text begin 0711921140006 new text end new text begin 0711921210003 new text end new text begin 0811921230002 new text end new text begin 0811921230004 new text end new text begin 0711921110005 new text end new text begin 0711921120009 new text end new text begin 0711921220003 new text end new text begin 0711921230001 new text end new text begin 0711921230002 new text end new text begin 0811921220002 new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Special rules. new text end new text begin If the city or the authority establishes a tax increment financing district under subdivision 1, the following special rules apply: new text end new text begin (1) the districts are deemed to meet all the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.174, subdivision 10; new text end new text begin (2) expenditures incurred in connection with the development of the property described in subdivision 1 are deemed to meet the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4j; new text end new text begin (3) in addition to any expenditure authorized to be financed with increment under Minnesota Statutes, section 469.176, subdivision 4, increments from such districts may be spent within the areas described in subdivision 1 on any of the following expenditures: new text end new text begin (i) building or property improvements that enhance environmental sustainability; new text end new text begin (ii) commercial and residential building rehabilitation or facade improvements; or new text end new text begin (iii) increased costs of building materials resulting from higher-quality building materials approved by the city or the authority; and new text end new text begin (4) the requirements, limitations, or restrictions in the following statutes do not apply: Minnesota Statutes, sections 469.174, subdivision 25, clause (2); 469.176, subdivisions 4l and 5; and 469.1763, subdivisions 2, 3, and 4. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Expiration. new text end new text begin The authority to request certification of any district under this section expires December 31, 2044. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Brooklyn Park and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin CITY OF BROOKLYN PARK; TIF AUTHORITY; DISTRICTS NOS. 18 AND 20.new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, sections 469.174 to 469.1794, increment from Tax Increment Financing Districts Nos. 18 and 20 may be collected for 25 years after receipt by the economic development authority of the city of Brooklyn Park of the first increment from the districts. Increment received by the economic development authority of the city of Brooklyn Park from Tax Increment Financing Districts Nos. 18 and 20 is not required to be returned to Hennepin County for redistribution and may be transferred to the account held by the city of Brooklyn Park or its economic development authority for Tax Increment Financing District No. 3 and spent in accordance with the requirements for expenditures of increment received from Tax Increment Financing District No. 3 and the budget for expenditures under the tax increment financing plan is deemed increased by the amount so transferred without any further action by the city or the authority. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin Notwithstanding Minnesota Statutes, section 469.1782, this section is effective the day after the governing body of the city of Brooklyn Park and its chief clerical officer comply with the requirements of Minnesota Statutes, section 645.021, subdivisions 2 and 3. new text end